Arizona, session 57th-2nd-regular, HB2567.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of the State of Arizona: Section 1. Heading change The chapter heading of title 44, chapter 38, Arizona Revised Statutes, is changed from "BUSINESSES EXEMPT FROM MASK MANDATE" to "BUSINESSES GENERALLY". Sec. 2. Title 44, chapter 38, article 1, Arizona Revised Statutes, is amended by adding section 44-7952, to read: START_STATUTE44-7952. Online lodging marketplaces; compliance; civil penalty; definitions A. An online lodging marketplace may not display or offer for rent a property or transact business for a property or online lodging operator in this state if the property or online lodging operator is not in compliance with all applicable state, county and local laws at the time of the rental or occupancy.  A person that violates this section is subject to a civil penalty of $250 for each violation.  Each day that a violation occurs constitutes a separate violation. B. Cities, towns and counties may verify and enforce an online lodging marketplace's compliance with this section, collect penalties and report to the department of revenue the number of violations and the total amount of penalties collected. C. For the purposes of this section: 1. "Online lodging marketplace" has the same meaning prescribed in section 42-5076. 2. "Online lodging operator" has the same meaning prescribed in section 42-5076. END_STATUTE